Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.062

Suspended sentence—Termination date—Application.

In all cases prior to August 9, 1971, wherein the execution of sentence has been suspended pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, such person may apply to the court by which he or she was convicted and sentenced to establish a definite termination date for the suspended sentence. The court shall set a date no later than the time the original sentence would have elapsed and may provide for an earlier termination of the suspended sentence.

[ 2011 c 336 s 330; 1971 ex.s. c 188 s 1.]

NOTES:

Applicability—1984 c 209: See RCW 9.92.900.